North Carolina, session 2025, SB740.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
non-recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Council for
Children's Rights, Inc. for operating expenses.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S740-v-1*